Hawaii, session 2026, SB2896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-102.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§286-102.3[]]  Commercial drivers under the age of twenty-one.  A person [is qualified to] may drive commercially in the State in intrastate commerce if the person: (1)  Is at least [nineteen] eighteen years of age; (2)  Is in compliance with title 49 Code of Federal Regulations[,] part 390-396, subpart B, except section 391.11(b)(1) in the case of an intrastate driver involved in intrastate commerce in the State; [(3)  Only operates a category 3 vehicle as defined in section 286-102(b)(3); (4)] (3)  [Shall] Does not transport hazardous materials [as defined in section 286-2, nor] or passengers in a school vehicle as defined in section 286-181; [and] [(5)] (4)  Has had a category 3 state driver's license for the two years immediately preceding driving commercially under this section, with the following conditions: (A)  Has not had any license suspended, revoked, or canceled; and (B)  Has not had any conviction for: (i)  Speeding excessively involving any speed of fifteen miles per hour or more above the speed limit; (ii)  Driving recklessly, as defined by state or local law or regulation, including but not limited to offenses of driving a motor vehicle in wilful or wanton disregard for the safety of person or property; (iii)  Making improper or erratic traffic lane changes; (iv)  Following the vehicle ahead too closely; or (v)  Violating state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, excluding parking violations, arising in connection with a fatal accident[.]; and (5)  Is under twenty-one years of age and actively enrolled in a commercial motor vehicle solely through a state‑approved commercial driver training program or registered apprenticeship program as determined by the department of labor and industrial relations; provided that a driver under twenty-one years of age shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle outside the scope, supervision, or duration of the approved training or apprenticeship program. For the purposes of this paragraph, "state-approved commercial driver training program or registered apprenticeship program" means a program approved or recognized by, or registered with, the department of labor and industrial relations, including programs registered pursuant to chapter 372 or other workforce development programs authorized by the department." SECTION 2.  The department of transportation shall adopt or amend rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as necessary to implement this Act, including licensing, enforcement, and coordination requirements with determinations made by the department of labor and industrial relations regarding approved training and apprenticeship programs. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.